Utah statutes.
53-2a-1011.   Enforcement of orders and rules.

The governor may apply to any district court for appropriate equitable relief against any person violating or failing to carry out the provisions of this part or any order or rule issued pursuant to this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

